Utah statutes.
26-2-3.   Department duties and authority.

(1)  The department shall:

(a)  provide offices properly equipped for the preservation of vital records made or received under this chapter;

(b)  establish a statewide vital records system for the registration, collection, preservation, amendment, and certification of vital records and other similar documents required by this chapter and activities related to them, including the tabulation, analysis, and publication of vital statistics;

(c)  prescribe forms for certificates, certification, reports, and other documents and records necessary to establish and maintain a statewide system of vital records;

(d)  prepare an annual compilation, analysis, and publication of statistics derived from vital records; and

(e)  appoint a state registrar to direct the statewide system of vital records.

(2)  The department may:

(a)  divide the state from time to time into registration districts; and

(b)  appoint local registrars for registration districts who under the direction and supervision of the state registrar shall perform all duties required of them by this chapter and  department rules.

(3)  The state registrar appointed under Subsection (1)(e) shall, during the 2013 interim, report to the Health and Human Services Interim Committee on the feasibility of partnering with the public legal notice website described in Subsection 45-1-101(2)(b) to create a national putative father registry.



Amended by Chapter 474, 2013 General Session

